apertium-cy-en.en.dix.xml
<pardef n="cho/ose__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ose</l>
          <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ose</l>
          <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>oses</l>
          <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>se</l>
          <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                               <e>
        <p>
          <l>sen</l>
          <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>osing</l>
          <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>osing</l>
          <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>osing</l>
          <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
  
    
<pardef n="cl/ing__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ings</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ung</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                               <e>
        <p>
          <l>ung</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>inging</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>inging</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>inging</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
   
    
<pardef n="cl/othe__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>othe</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>othe</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>othes</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                               <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>othing</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>othing</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>othing</l>
          <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
   
    
<pardef n="control__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>led</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                               <e>
        <p>
          <l>led</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ling</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ling</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ling</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

    
<pardef n="ke/ep__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ep</l>
          <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ep</l>
          <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>eps</l>
          <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>pt</l>
          <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                               <e>
        <p>
          <l>pt</l>
          <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>eping</l>
          <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>eping</l>
          <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>eping</l>
          <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
  
    
<pardef n="deal__vblex">

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                               <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

    

                        <e lm="choose"><i>cho</i><par n="cho/ose__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="control"><i>control</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="deal"><i>deal</i><par n="deal__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="fulfil"><i>fulfil</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="keep"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="learn"><i>learn</i><par n="deal__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="mean"><i>mean</i><par n="deal__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="sleep"><i>sle</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="travel"><i>travel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="deal with"><i>deal</i><par n="deal__vblex"/><p><l><b/>with</l><r><g><b/>with</g></r></p></e>
                        <e lm="keep on"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/><p><l><b/>on</l><r><g><b/>on</g></r></p></e>
                        <e lm="sweep"><i>swe</i> <par n="ke/ep__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="dispel"><i>dispel</i> <par n="control__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="expel"><i>expel</i> <par n="control__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="label"><i>label</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="enrol"><i>enrol</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="enrol"><i>enrol</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="propel"><i>propel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="repel"><i>repel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="cancel"><i>cancel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="cling"><i>cl</i><par n="cl/ing__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="creep"><i>cre</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="signal"><i>signal</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="weep"><i>we</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/></e>
                        <e r="LR"><i>burn</i><par n="deal__vblex"/></e>
                        <e r="LR"><i>lean</i><par n="deal__vblex"/></e>
                        <e r="LR"><i>dream</i><par n="deal__vblex"/></e>
                        <e r="LR"><i>leap</i><par n="deal__vblex"/></e>
                        <e lm="swing"><i>sw</i><par n="cl/ing__vblex"/></e>
